Maine, session 132, LD1638.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §17906, sub-§2, ¶A, as amended by PL 1991, c. 885, Pt. E, §8
and affected by §47, is further amended to read:
A. The amount of any disability retirement benefit payable under this article must be
reduced by any amount received by the beneficiary for the same disability under either
or both of the following:
(1) The worker's compensation or similar law, except amounts that may be paid
or payable under former Title 39, section 56‑B or Title 39‑A, section 212,
subsection 3; or.
(2) The United States Social Security Act, if the employment for which creditable
service with the employer is allowed was also covered under that Act at the date
of disability retirement.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §17925, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2015, c. 392, §1, is repealed.
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §18525, sub-§3, as amended by PL 1995, c. 643, §21, is repealed.
Sec. 4. 5 MRSA §18530, sub-§4, ¶A, as amended by PL 1991, c. 885, Pt. E, §15
and affected by §47, is further amended to read:
A. The amount of any disability retirement benefit payable under this article must be
reduced by any amount received by the person for the same disability under either or
both of the following:
(1) The workers' compensation or similar laws, except amounts that may be paid
or payable under former Title 39, section 56‑B or Title 39‑A, section 212,
subsection 3; or.
(2) The United States Social Security Act, if the employment for which creditable
service with the employer is allowed was also covered under that Act at the date
of disability retirement.
Page 1 - 132LR1228(03)

Sec. 5. Retroactivity; payment of benefits and interest. This Act applies
retroactively to January 1, 2024 for a person who was receiving disability retirement
benefits under the Maine Public Employees Retirement System as of December 31, 2024
if those disability retirement benefits were reduced because the person received disability
retirement benefits under the United States Social Security Act. A person affected by this
Act must be paid the difference between:
1. The amount of disability retirement benefits, including any cost-of-living
adjustments, the person would have received absent any reduction to such benefits due to
the receipt of disability retirement benefits under the United States Social Security Act; and
2. The amount of disability retirement benefits the person actually received.
The person must be paid the difference with interest accruing from January 1, 2024 to
the date the payment is made pursuant to this section. The rate of interest must be 6.5%.
Page 2 - 132LR1228(03)